pt-BR: Eletrônicos > Acessórios para eletrônicos > Componentes para computador > Racks e suportes para computadores: Trilhos e hardware para montagem em rack; Painéis para rack; Prateleiras e bandejas para rack; Gabinetes e enclosures para servidor
sk-SK: Elektronika > Elektronické príslušenstvo > Počítačové komponenty > Počítačové stojany a držiaky: Rackové montážne koľajnice a hardvér; Rackové panely; Rackové police a tácky; Serverové skrine a kryty
ja: 電子機器 > 電気製品関連用品・PC周辺機器 > PC部品・周辺機器 > PCラック・マウント: ラックマウント用レール・ハードウェア; ラックパネル; ラックシェルフ・トレイ; サーバーキャビネット・エンクロージャー
zh-CN: 电子产品 > 电子配件 > 计算机组件 > 电脑架/电脑支架: 机架安装导轨和硬件; 机架面板; 机架层板和托盘; 服务器机柜和外壳
nl: Elektronica > Accessoires voor elektronica > Computeronderdelen > Computerracks en -standaarden: Rack bevestigingsrails en -hardware; Rack panelen; Rack schappen en trays; Server kasten en behuizingen
en: Electronics > Electronics Accessories > Computer Components > Computer Racks & Mounts: Rack Mount Rails & Hardware; Rack Panels; Rack Shelves & Trays; Server Cabinets & Enclosures
th: อิเล็กทรอนิกส์ > อุปกรณ์อิเล็กทรอนิกส์ > ส่วนประกอบคอมพิวเตอร์ > แร็คและขายึดคอมพิวเตอร์: รางและฮาร์ดแวร์ติดตั้งแร็ค; แผงแร็ค; ชั้นวางและถาดแร็ค; ตู้และกล่องบรรจุเซิร์ฟเวอร์
pl: Elektronika > Akcesoria elektroniczne > Elementy komputera > Szafy rackowe: Szyny i osprzęt do montażu w racku; Panele do szaf rack; Półki i tace do szaf rack; Szafki serwerowe i obudowy
lt-LT: Elektronika > Elektronikos priedai > Kompiuterių komponentai > Kompiuterių stovai ir laikikliai: Stelažų montavimo bėgeliai ir įranga; Stelažų plokštės; Stelažų lentynos ir padėklai; Serverių spintos ir korpusai
ko: 전자기기 > 전자기기 부대용품 > 컴퓨터 구성품 > 컴퓨터 랙/마운트: 랙 마운트 레일 및 하드웨어; 랙 패널; 랙 선반 및 트레이; 서버 캐비닛 및 인클로저
sv: Elektronik > Elektroniktillbehör > Datorkomponenter > Datorrack: Rackmonteringsskenor och hårdvara; Rackpaneler; Rackhyllor och brickor; Serverskåp och höljen
hr-HR: Elektronika > Pribor za elektroniku > Računalne komponente > Stalci i nosači za računala: Tračnica i oprema za montažu u ormar; Paneli ormara; Police i ladice za ormar; Ormari i police za poslužitelje
ro-RO: Electronice > Accesorii electronice > Componente calculatoare > Sisteme rack și suporturi pentru calculatoare: Șine și hardware pentru montare în rack; Panouri pentru rack; Rafturi și tăvi pentru rack; Dulapuri și incinte pentru servere
de: Elektronik > Elektronisches Zubehör > Computerkomponenten > Computerregale & -Befestigungssysteme: Rack-Montageschienen und -Hardware; Rack-Paneele; Rack-Regale und -Tabletts; Serverschränke und -Gehäuse
vi: Thiết bị điện tử > Phụ kiện thiết bị điện tử > Linh kiện máy tính > Tủ & Giá để máy tính: Ray và phần cứng gắn rack; Bảng rack; Kệ và khay rack; Tủ và vỏ máy chủ
hu: Elektronika > Elektronikai kiegészítők > Számítógép-komponensek > Számítógépes állványok és rögzítők: Állványra szerelhető sínek és hardver; Állványpanelek; Állványpolcok és -tálcák; Szerverszekrények és -házak
da: Elektronik > Elektronik – tilbehør > Computerkomponenter > Computer – rack og montering: Rackmontering – skinner og hardware; Rack-paneler; Rack-hylder og bakker; Server – skabe og rum
fr: Appareil électronique > Accessoires électroniques > Composants d’ordinateur > Baies et supports pour ordinateurs: Rails et quincaillerie de montage en rack; Panneaux de rack; Étagères et plateaux de rack; Armoires et baies pour serveurs
tr: Elektronik > Elektronik Alet Aksesuarları > Bilgisayar Bileşenleri > Bilgisayar Rafları ve Montaj Kitleri: Raf Montaj Rayları ve Donanımları; Raf Panelleri; Raf Rafları ve Tepsileri; Sunucu Kabinleri ve Muhafazaları
ru: Электроника > Аксессуары для электроники > Компьютерные компоненты > Компьютерные стойки и крепления: Рельсы и крепежное оборудование для стоечного монтажа; Панели для стоек; Полки и лотки для стоек; Серверные шкафы и корпуса
es: Electrónica > Accesorios electrónicos > Componentes para computadoras > Carcasas para computadoras: Rieles de montaje en bastidor y hardware; Paneles de bastidor; Estantes y bandejas de bastidor; Gabinetes y carcasas de servidor
it: Elettronica > Accessori dispositivi elettronici > Componenti per computer > Scaffali e supporti computer: Guide e ferramenta per montaggio in rack; Pannelli rack; Ripiani e vassoi rack; Armadi server e involucri
fi: Elektroniikka > Sähkötarvikkeet > Tietokonekomponentit > Tietokonetelineet: Telineasennuskiskot ja -kiinnittimet; Telinepaneeli; Telinehylly ja -teline; Palvelinkaapit ja -kotelot
nb: Elektronikk > Elektronikktilbehør > Datamaskinkomponenter > Datamaskinstativer og -fester: Rackmonteringsskinner og -maskinvare; Rackpaneler; Rackhyller og -skuffer; Serverskap og -kabinetter
sl-SI: Elektronika > Elektronski dodatki > Računalniške komponente > Računalniška stojala in nosilci: Tirnice in strojna oprema za regal montažo; Regalni paneli; Regalne police in pladnji; Strežniške omare in ohišja
cs: Elektronika > Elektronika – příslušenství > Počítačové komponenty > Skříně a držáky na počítače: Lišty a hardware pro rack montáž; Panely racků; Police a šuplíky do racků; Serverové skříně a kryty
el: Ηλεκτρονικά > Αξεσουάρ ηλεκτρονικών συσκευών > Εξαρτήματα υπολογιστή > Ράφια και βάσεις υπολογιστών: Ράγες και εξαρτήματα τοποθέτησης σε racks; Πάνελ για racks; Ράφια και δίσκοι για racks; Ντουλάπια και περιβλήματα για διακομιστές
zh-TW: 電子器材 > 電子配件 > 電腦元件 > 電腦架: 機架式滑軌與五金配件; 機架面板; 機架層板與托盤; 伺服器機櫃與機箱
pt-PT: Eletrónica > Acessórios eletrónicos > Componentes informáticos > Bastidores e suportes de computador: Calhas e ferragens de montagem em rack; Painéis para rack; Prateleiras e bandejas para rack; Armários e caixas para servidor
bg-BG: Електроника > Аксесоари за електроника > Компютърни компоненти > Рафтове и стойки за компютри: Релси и оборудване за монтаж на рафтове; Панели за комуникационни шкафове; Рафтове и поставки за комуникационни шкафове; Шкафове и кутии за сървър